Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 4
MISCELLANEOUS

7-56-718. Certain assignments of assets in dissolution.

In the winding up of the affairs of a cooperative when certain assets are not liquid and secured creditors having claim on these assets have been satisfied, the trustees in liquidation or other persons charged with winding up the cooperative's affairs are authorized to make assignment of such assets to the unsecured creditors in settlement of their claims. If assignment is refused in writing, and in the judgment of the trustees there is no liquidity or market value and the costs involved in delaying the winding up of the affairs of the cooperative exceed the potential benefits, the trustees are authorized to assign the assets or future proceeds to any local or statewide nonprofit organization that has as one of its principal purposes education or community service. The trustees shall under no circumstances be liable to any member or equity holder in the cooperative for any claim on any assets assigned by the trustees pursuant to the authority of this section.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 534, § 1, effective July 1.